Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 7.3. Virginia Blue Alert Program.

§ 52-34.7.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Law-enforcement agency”
means a law-enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the search for a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a law-enforcement officer or an agency employing a law-enforcement officer who is missing in the line of duty.

“Law-enforcement officer”
means any full-time or part-time employee of the Department of State Police or a police department or sheriff’s office that is a part of or administered by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, and any campus police officer appointed under Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1, who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

2011, c. 669; 2012, c. 776.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer” to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 776 inserted “and any campus police officers appointed under Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” in the last paragraph.

§ 52-34.8.
Establishment of the Virginia Blue Alert Program.

The Department of State Police shall establish a Blue Alert Program in the Commonwealth and develop policies for its implementation. The Blue Alert Program may be activated when a suspect for a crime involving the death or serious injury of a law-enforcement officer has not been apprehended and may be a serious threat to the public or when a law-enforcement officer is missing while in the line of duty under circumstances warranting concern for the law-enforcement officer’s safety. The Department of State Police shall (i) establish procedures and standards by which a local law-enforcement agency may assess whether the conditions for a Blue Alert have been met and report such information to the Department of State Police, (ii) inform local law-enforcement officials of the policies and procedures for the Blue Alert Program set by the Department, and (iii) assist in determining the geographic scope of a particular Blue Alert.

History.

2011, c. 669.

§ 52-34.9.
Activation of Blue Alert Program.

Upon notification by a law-enforcement agency that a suspect in a case involving the death or serious injury of a law-enforcement officer has not been apprehended and may be a serious threat to the public, the Department of State Police shall confirm that (i) a suspect has not been apprehended, (ii) the suspect may be a serious threat to the public, and (iii) sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the suspect.

Upon notification by a law-enforcement agency that a law-enforcement officer is missing while in the line of duty under circumstances warranting concern for such law-enforcement officer’s safety, the Department of State Police shall confirm this information and determine whether sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the missing law-enforcement officer.

Upon verification that conditions set forth in subsection A or B have been met, the Department of State Police shall activate the Blue Alert Program.

The area of the alert may be less than statewide if the Department of State Police determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the suspect did not leave a certain geographic location or if the nature of the event makes it probable that the missing law-enforcement officer is within a certain geographic location. The Department of State Police shall assess the appropriate boundaries for the alert based on the nature of the suspect, the circumstances surrounding the crime or the last known location of the missing law-enforcement officer.

The Blue Alert shall include such information as the Department of State Police deems appropriate that will assist in the apprehension of the suspect or the locating of the missing law-enforcement officer.

A law-enforcement agency shall notify the Department of State Police immediately when the suspect is located or the law-enforcement officer is found or the incident is otherwise resolved.

The Department of State Police shall terminate any activation of the Blue Alert Program with respect to a particular incident if (i) the suspect or law-enforcement officer is located or the incident is otherwise resolved or (ii) the Department of State Police determines that the Blue Alert Program is no longer an effective tool for locating the suspect or law-enforcement officer.

History.

2011, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. No state or local government department, agency, or instrumentality having jurisdiction over criminal law enforcement or regulatory violations, including but not limited to the Department of State Police, and no department of law enforcement as defined in §

15.2-836

of the Code of Virginia of any county, city, or town shall utilize an unmanned aircraft system before July 1, 2015.

“Notwithstanding the prohibition in this section, an unmanned aircraft system may be deployed before July 1, 2015, (i) when an Amber Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.3

of the Code of Virginia, (ii) when a Senior Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.6

of the Code of Virginia, (iii) when a Blue Alert is activated pursuant to §

52-34.9

of the Code of Virginia, (iv) for the purpose of a search or rescue operation where use of an unmanned aircraft system is determined to be necessary to alleviate an immediate danger to any person, or (v) for training exercises related to such uses. In no case may a weaponized unmanned aircraft system be deployed or its use facilitated by a state or local agency in Virginia.

“The prohibitions in this section shall not apply to the Virginia National Guard while utilizing unmanned aircraft systems during training required to maintain readiness for its federal mission, when facilitating training for other United States Department of Defense units, or when such systems are utilized to support the Commonwealth for purposes other than law enforcement, including damage assessment, traffic assessment, flood stages, and wildfire assessment. Nothing herein shall prohibit use of unmanned aircraft systems solely for research and development purposes by institutions of higher education and other research organizations or institutions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and other state agencies, shall develop model protocols for use of unmanned aircraft systems by law-enforcement agencies and shall report such findings to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before November 1, 2013.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Unmanned aircraft system. —

Based on the accepted industry definition of an “unmanned aircraft system” and legislative intent, Acts 2013, cc. 755 and 796 (as noted under this section), which is effective until July 1, 2015, temporarily prohibits the use of even a single remotely controlled aerial vehicle by state or local law enforcement for the purpose of gathering evidence pursuant to a search warrant. Chapter 755, however, does not prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft systems for specified humanitarian purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ronald K. Elkins, Commonwealth’s Attorney, Wise County & City of Norton, No. 14-051, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 59 (10/9/14).